Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 179A.03, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Public employer or employer. (a) "Public employer" or "employer" means: (1) the state of Minnesota for employees of the state not otherwise provided for in this subdivision or section 179A.10 for executive branch employees; (2) the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for its employees; (3) the state court administrator for court employees; (4) the state Board of Public Defense for its employees; (5) Hennepin Healthcare System, Inc.; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (6) the Minnesota Competency Attainment Board for its employees; and new text end deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7) new text end notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the governing body of a political subdivision or its agency or instrumentality which has final budgetary approval authority for its employees. However, the views of elected appointing authorities who have standing to initiate interest arbitration, and who are responsible for the selection, direction, discipline, and discharge of individual employees shall be considered by the employer in the course of the discharge of rights and duties under sections 179A.01 to 179A.25. (b) When two or more units of government subject to sections 179A.01 to 179A.25 undertake a project or form a new agency under law authorizing common or joint action, the employer is the governing person or board of the created agency. The governing official or body of the cooperating governmental units shall be bound by an agreement entered into by the created agency according to sections 179A.01 to 179A.25. (c) "Public employer" or "employer" does not include a "charitable hospital" as defined in section 179.35, subdivision 2, except that a charitable hospital as defined by section 179.35, subdivision 2, is a public employer for purposes of sections 179A.051, 179A.052, and 179A.13. (d) Nothing in this subdivision diminishes the authority granted pursuant to law to an appointing authority with respect to the selection, direction, discipline, or discharge of an individual employee if this action is consistent with general procedures and standards relating to selection, direction, discipline, or discharge which are the subject of an agreement entered into under sections 179A.01 to 179A.25. Sec. 2. new text begin [179A.105] MINNESOTA COMPETENCY ATTAINMENT BOARD. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Employee units. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Competency Attainment Board must meet and negotiate with the exclusive representative of the forensic navigator unit. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Exclusions. new text end new text begin The following employees are excluded from the appropriate statewide unit under subdivision 1: new text end new text begin (1) the position of program administrator; new text end new text begin (2) positions of all confidential, managerial, and supervisory employees; and new text end new text begin (3) positions of all employees in the administrative office. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [179A.227] MINNESOTA COMPETENCY ATTAINMENT BOARD EMPLOYEES; NEGOTIATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Program administrator; duties. new text end new text begin In all negotiations between the Minnesota Competency Attainment Board and exclusive representatives, the board must be represented by the program administrator or the program administrator's designee or designees. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Agreements. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Competency Attainment Board is authorized to enter into agreements with exclusive representatives. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611.55, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Availability of forensic navigator services. new text begin Within available resources, new text end the board must provide deleted text begin or contract fordeleted text end enough forensic navigator services to meet the needs of adult defendants in each judicial district who are found incompetent to proceed. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 611.56, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment; membership. (a) The Minnesota Competency Attainment Board is established in the judicial branch. The board is not subject to the administrative control of the judiciary. The board shall consist of seven members, including: (1) three members appointed by the supreme court, at least one of whom must be a defense attorney, one a county attorney, and one public member; and (2) four members appointed by the governor, at least one of whom must be a mental health professional with experience in competency attainment. (b) The appointing authorities may not appoint an active judge to be a member of the board, but may appoint a retired judge. (c) All members must demonstrate an interest in maintaining a high quality, independent forensic navigator program and a thorough process for certification of competency attainment programs. Members shall be familiar with the Minnesota Rules of Criminal Procedure, particularly rule 20; chapter 253B; and sections 611.40 to 611.59. deleted text begin At least three members ofdeleted text end The board deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin should include members who new text end live outside the deleted text begin First, Second, Fourth, and Tenth Judicial Districtsdeleted text end new text begin metropolitan counties as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 4new text end . The terms, compensation, and removal of members shall be as provided in section 15.0575. The members shall elect the chair from among the membership for a term of two years. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611.56, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Duties and responsibilities. (a) The board shall create and administer a statewide, independent competency attainment system that certifies competency attainment programs and uses forensic navigators to promote prevention and diversion of people with mental illnesses and cognitive impairments from entering the legal system, support defendants with mental illness and cognitive impairments, support defendants in the competency process, and assist courts and partners in coordinating competency attainment services. (b) The board shall: (1) approve and recommend to the legislature a budget for the board and the forensic navigator program; (2) establish procedures for distribution of funding under this section to the forensic navigator program;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (3) establish forensic navigator standards, administrative policies, procedures, and rules consistent with statute, rules of court, and laws that affect a forensic navigator's work; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) establish certification requirements for competency attainment programs; and deleted text end deleted text begin (5) carry out the programs under sections 611.57, 611.58, and 611.59. deleted text end new text begin (3) adopt standards, policies, procedures, and rules that determine the operation and administration of the Minnesota Competency Attainment Board, including: new text end new text begin (i) section 611.55, forensic navigator services; new text end new text begin (ii) sections 611.57, certification advisory committee; 611.58, competency attainment curriculum and certification; and 611.59, competency attainment programs; and new text end new text begin (iii) access to records. new text end (c) The board may: (1) adopt standards, policies, or procedures necessary to ensure quality assistance for defendants found incompetent to stand trial and charged with a felony, gross misdemeanor, or targeted misdemeanor, or for defendants found incompetent to stand trial who have recurring incidents; (2) establish district forensic navigator offices as provided in subdivision 4; and (3) propose statutory changes to the legislature deleted text begin and rule changes to the supreme court that would facilitate the effective operation of the forensic navigator programdeleted text end . Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611.56, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Access to recordsnew text begin ; immunitynew text end . deleted text begin Access to records of the board is subject to the Rules of Public Access for Records of the Judicial Branch. The board may propose amendments for supreme court considerationdeleted text end new text begin Absent willful or malicious conduct, the board and its employees are immune from civil liability for conduct related to providing access under this sectionnew text end .